Utah statutes.
9-3-504.   Member or employee -- Disclosure of interest.
Any member or employee of the authority who has, will have, or later acquires
an interest, direct or indirect, in any transaction with the authority shall
immediately disclose the nature and extent of that interest in writing to the
authority as soon as the member or employee has knowledge of the actual or
prospective interest.  This disclosure shall be entered upon the minutes of
the authority.  Upon this disclosure that member or employee may participate
in any action by the authority authorizing the transaction.
